Alaska statutes. Title 45. Trade and Commerce.
Article 3. Bills of Lading:
Special Provisions.

Sec. 45.07.301.
Liability for nonreceipt or misdescription; “said to contain”; “shipper’s weight, load, and count”; improper handling.

A consignee of a nonnegotiable bill of lading who has given value in good faith, or a holder to whom a negotiable bill has been duly negotiated, relying on the description in the bill of the goods or on the date shown in the bill, may recover from the issuer damages caused by the misdating of the bill or the nonreceipt or misdescription of the goods, except to the extent that the bill indicates that the issuer does not know whether a part or all of the goods in fact were received or conform to the description, as where the description is in terms of marks or labels or kind, quantity, or condition or the receipt or description is qualified by “contents or condition of contents of packages unknown,” “said to contain,” “shipper’s weight, load, and count,” or words of similar import, if this indication is true.

If goods are loaded by the issuer of a bill of lading,

the issuer shall count the packages of goods if shipped in packages and ascertain the kind and quantity if shipped in bulk; and

the words, “shipper’s weight, load, and count,” or other words of similar import indicating that the description was made by the shipper are ineffective except as to goods concealed in packages.

If bulk goods are loaded by a shipper who makes available to the issuer of a bill of lading adequate facilities for weighing those goods, the issuer shall ascertain the kind and quantity within a reasonable time after receiving the shipper’s request in a record to ascertain the kind and quantity. In this case, “shipper’s weight” or other words of similar import are ineffective.

The issuer of a bill of lading, by including in the bill the words “shipper’s weight, load, and count” or words of similar import, may indicate that the goods were loaded by the shipper, and, if the statement is true, the issuer is not liable for damages caused by the improper loading. However, omission of these words does not imply liability for damages by improper loading.

A shipper guarantees to an issuer the accuracy at the time of shipment of the description, marks, labels, number, kind, quantity, condition, and weight as furnished by the shipper, and the shipper shall indemnify the issuer against damage caused by inaccuracies in these particulars. This right of indemnity does not limit the issuer’s responsibility or liability under the contract of carriage to a person other than the shipper.

History.

(§ 7.301 ch 114 SLA 1962; am § 49 ch 44 SLA 2009)

Cross references. —

For applicability and savings provisions related to the 2009 amendment of this section, see §§ 115 and 116, ch. 44, SLA 2009, quoted in the editor’s note that follows the chapter analysis for this chapter.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective January 1, 2010, in the section heading, substituted “shipper’s weight, load, and count” for “shipper’s load and count”; in (a), added “of lading” following “a nonnegotiable bill”, substituted “on” for “in either case upon” following “relying”, substituted “on” for “upon” following “the bill of the goods or”, substituted “bill” for “document” following “except to the extent that the”, substituted “words of similar import” for “the like” following “ ‘shipper’s weight, load, and count,’ or”; in (b), in the introductory language, substituted “issuer of a bill of lading” for “issuer who is a common carrier”, added the (b)(1) and (b)(2) designations, and in (b)(1), substituted “shipped in packages” for “package freight”, and “if shipped in bulk; and” for “if bulk”, in (b)(2), substituted “the words,” for “freight in this case” at the beginning, added “of similar import” following “or other words”, substituted “goods concealed in packages” for “freight concealed by packages” at the end; rewrote (c), which read, “If bulk freight is loaded by a shipper who makes available to the issuer adequate facilities for weighing the freight, an issuer who is a common carrier must ascertain the kind and quantity within a reasonable time after receiving the written request of the shipper to do so. In this case ‘shipper’s weight‘ or other words of like purport are ineffective.”; in (d), in the first sentence, substituted, “The issuer of a bill of lading, by including” for “The issuer may by inserting”, substituted “or words of similar import, may” for “other words of like purport” preceding “indicate that the goods”, and rewrote the second sentence, which read, “But their omission does not imply liability for the damages.”; in (e), in the first sentence, substituted “A shipper guarantees to an issuer” for “The shipper is considered to have guaranteed to the issuer”, and in the second sentence, substituted “This right of indemnity does not limit the issuer’s responsibility or” for “The right of the issuer to this indemnity in no way limits the issuer’s responsibility and”; made stylistic changes throughout the section.

Sec. 45.07.302.
Through bills of lading and similar documents of title.

The issuer of a through bill of lading, or other document of title embodying an undertaking to be performed in part by a person acting as the issuer’s agent or by a performing carrier, is liable to a person entitled to recover on the bill or other document for a breach by the other person or the performing carrier of its obligation under the bill or other document. However, this liability for breach by the other person or the performing carrier may be varied by agreement of the parties, except to the extent other law prohibits variation of the liability by agreement.

If goods covered by a through bill of lading or other document of title embodying an undertaking to be performed in part by a person other than the issuer are received by the other person, the person is subject, with respect to its own performance while the goods are in its possession, to the obligation of the issuer. The person’s obligation is discharged by delivery of the goods to another person under the bill or other document, and does not include liability for breach by another person or by the issuer.

The issuer of a through bill of lading or other document of title described in (a) of this section may recover from the performing carrier, or other person in possession of the goods when the breach of the obligation under the bill occurred, the amount

the issuer may be required to pay to a person entitled to recover on the bill or other document for the breach, as may be evidenced by a receipt, judgment, or transcript of judgment; and

of an expense reasonably incurred by the issuer in defending an action commenced by a person entitled to recover on the bill or other document for the breach.

History.

(§ 7.302 ch 114 SLA 1962; am § 50 ch 44 SLA 2009)

Cross references. —

For applicability and savings provisions related to the 2009 amendment of this section, see §§ 115 and 116, ch. 44, SLA 2009, quoted in the editor’s note that follows the chapter analysis for this chapter.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective January 1, 2010, in the section heading, added “of title” following “documents”; rewrote (a), which read, “The issuer of a through bill of lading or other document embodying an undertaking to be performed in part by persons acting as the issuer’s agents or by connecting carriers is liable to anyone entitled to recover on the document for a breach by the other persons or by a connecting carrier of its obligation under the document, but, to the extent that the bill covers an undertaking to be performed overseas or in territory not contiguous to the continental United States or an undertaking including matters other than transportation, this liability may be varied by agreement of the parties.”; in (b), added “of title” following “bill of lading or other document” and “bill or other” following “person under the”; in the introductory language of (c), added “of title described in (a) of this section” following “bill of lading or other document”, substituted “performing carrier” for “connecting carrier” and “obligation under the bill” for “obligation under the document”, added the (c)(1) and (c)(2) designations, and, in (c)(1), substituted “the issuer may be required to pay to a person” for “the issuer is required to pay to anyone”, added “bill or other” preceding “document for the breach,” and substituted “transcript of judgment” for “transcript of that amount”, and in (c)(2), substituted “of an expense” for “the amount of expense”, substituted “issuer” for “carrier”, substituted “an action commenced by a person” for “an action brought by anyone” and added “bill or other” preceding “document for the breach”; made stylistic changes throughout the section.

Sec. 45.07.303.
Diversion; reconsignment; change of instructions.

Unless the bill of lading otherwise provides, a carrier may deliver the goods to a person or destination other than that stated in the bill or may otherwise dispose of the goods, without liability for misdelivery, on instructions from

the holder of a negotiable bill;

the consignor on a nonnegotiable bill, even if the consignee has given contrary instructions;

the consignee on a nonnegotiable bill in the absence of contrary instructions from the consignor, if the goods have arrived at the billed destination or if the consignee is in possession of the tangible bill or in control of the electronic bill; or

the consignee on a nonnegotiable bill, if the consignee is entitled as against the consignor to dispose of the goods.

Unless instructions described in (a) of this section are included in a negotiable bill of lading, a person to whom the bill is duly negotiated may hold the bailee according to the original terms.

History.

(§ 7.303 ch 114 SLA 1962; am § 51 ch 44 SLA 2009)

Cross references. —

For applicability and savings provisions related to the 2009 amendment of this section, see §§ 115 and 116, ch. 44, SLA 2009, quoted in the editor’s note that follows the chapter analysis for this chapter.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective January 1, 2010, in the introductory language of (a), added “, without liability for misdelivery,” preceding “on instructions from”, rewrote (a)(2), which read, “the consignor on a nonnegotiable bill notwithstanding contrary instruction from the consignee”, in (a)(3), substituted “the tangible bill or in control of the electronic bill” for “the bill”, and in (a)(4), substituted “the goods” for “them” at the end; rewrote (b), which read, “Unless the instructions are noted on a negotiable bill of lading, a person to whom the bill is duly negotiated can hold the bailee according to the original terms.”; made stylistic changes throughout the section.

Sec. 45.07.304.
Tangible bills of lading in a set.

Except as customary in international transportation, a tangible bill of lading may not be issued in a set of parts. The issuer is liable for damages caused by violation of this subsection.

If a tangible bill of lading is lawfully issued in a set of parts, each of which contains an identification code and is expressed to be valid only if the goods have not been delivered against another part, the whole of the parts constitutes one bill.

If a tangible negotiable bill of lading is lawfully issued in a set of parts and different parts are negotiated to different persons, the title of the holder to whom the first due negotiation is made prevails as to both the document of title and the goods even if a later holder may have received the goods from the carrier in good faith and discharged the carrier’s obligation by surrendering its part.

A person who negotiates or transfers a single part of a tangible bill of lading issued in a set is liable to holders of that part as if it were the whole set.

The bailee shall deliver in accordance with AS

45.07.401

—

45.07.404

against the first presented part of a tangible bill of lading lawfully issued in a set. Delivery in this manner discharges the bailee’s obligation on the whole bill.

History.

(§ 7.304 ch 114 SLA 1962; am § 52 ch 44 SLA 2009)

Cross references. —

For applicability and savings provisions related to the 2009 amendment of this section, see §§ 115 and 116, ch. 44, SLA 2009, quoted in the editor’s note that follows the chapter analysis for this chapter.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective January 1, 2010, in the section heading, substituted “Tangible bills” for “Bills”; in (a), substituted “international” for “overseas”, substituted “a tangible bill of lading may not” for “a bill of lading must not” preceding “be issued in a set of parts”; in (b), added “tangible” preceding “bill of lading”, substituted “issued” for “drawn” following “lawfully”, substituted “contains an identification code and is” for “is numbered and”, substituted “against another part” for “against any other part”; in (c), substituted “If a tangible negotiable bill of lading” for “If a bill of lading”, substituted “both the document of title and the goods even if” for “both the document and the goods even though”, substituted “carrier’s obligation by surrendering its part” for “carrier’s obligation by surrender of the later holder’s part”; in (d), substituted “a tangible bill of lading issued” for “a bill of lading drawn”; in (e), in the first sentence, substituted “The bailee shall deliver” for “The bailee is obliged to deliver”, substituted “tangible bill of lading lawfully issued” for “bill of lading lawfully drawn”, and in the second sentence of (e), substituted “Delivery in this manner” for “This delivery”; made stylistic changes throughout the section.

Sec. 45.07.305.
Destination bills.

Instead of issuing a bill of lading to the consignor at the place of shipment, a carrier may, at the request of the consignor, procure the bill to be issued at destination or at any other place designated in the request.

Upon request of a person entitled as against a carrier to control the goods while in transit and on surrender of possession or control of an outstanding bill of lading or other receipt covering the goods, the issuer, subject to AS

45.07.115

, may procure a substitute bill to be issued at a place designated in the request.

History.

(§ 7.305 ch 114 SLA 1962; am § 53 ch 44 SLA 2009)

Cross references. —

For applicability and savings provisions related to the 2009 amendment of this section, see §§ 115 and 116, ch. 44, SLA 2009, quoted in the editor’s note that follows the chapter analysis for this chapter.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective January 1, 2010, in (b), substituted “Upon request of a person” for “Upon request of anyone”, added “possession or control of” preceding “an outstanding bill of lading”, and “, subject to AS

45.07.115

,” preceding “may procure a substitute bill”, and made stylistic changes.

Sec. 45.07.306.
Altered bills of lading.

An unauthorized alteration or filling in of a blank in a bill of lading leaves the bill enforceable according to its original tenor.

History.

(§ 7.306 ch 114 SLA 1962)

Sec. 45.07.307.
Lien of carrier.

A carrier has a lien on the goods covered by a bill of lading or on the proceeds of the goods in its possession for charges after the date of the carrier’s receipt of the goods for storage or transportation, including demurrage and terminal charges, and for expenses necessary for preservation of the goods incident to their transportation or reasonably incurred in their sale under law. However, against a purchaser for value of a negotiable bill of lading, a carrier’s lien is limited to charges stated in the bill or the applicable tariffs, or, if no charges are stated, to a reasonable charge.

A lien for charges and expenses under (a) of this section on goods that the carrier was required by law to receive for transportation is effective against the consignor or a person entitled to the goods unless the carrier had notice that the consignor lacked authority to subject the goods to the charges and expenses. Another lien under (a) of this section is effective against the consignor and a person who permitted the bailor to have control or possession of the goods unless the carrier had notice that the bailor lacked authority.

A carrier loses its lien on goods that the carrier voluntarily delivers or unjustifiably refuses to deliver.

History.

(§ 7.307 ch 114 SLA 1962; am § 54 ch 44 SLA 2009)

Cross references. —

For applicability and savings provisions related to the 2009 amendment of this section, see §§ 115 and 116, ch. 44, SLA 2009, quoted in the editor’s note that follows the chapter analysis for this chapter.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective January 1, 2010, in (a), added “or on the proceeds of the goods in its possession” following “covered by a bill of lading” and made stylistic changes throughout the section.

Sec. 45.07.308.
Enforcement of carrier’s lien.

A carrier’s lien on goods may be enforced by public or private sale of the goods, in bulk or in packages, at any time or place, and on terms that are commercially reasonable, after notifying all persons known to claim an interest in the goods. The notification must include a statement of the amount due, the nature of the proposed sale, and the time and place of any public sale. The fact that a better price could have been obtained by a sale at a different time or by a method different from that selected by the carrier is not of itself sufficient to establish that the sale was not made in a commercially reasonable manner. The carrier sells goods in a commercially reasonable manner if the carrier sells the goods in the usual manner in a recognized market for them, sells at the price current in that market at the time of the sale, or otherwise sells in conformity with commercially reasonable practices among dealers in the type of goods sold. A sale of more goods than apparently necessary to be offered to ensure satisfaction of the obligation is not commercially reasonable except in cases covered by the preceding sentence.

Before a sale under this section, a person claiming a right in the goods may pay the amount necessary to satisfy the lien and the reasonable expenses incurred in complying with this section. In that event, the goods may not be sold but must be retained by the carrier, subject to the terms of the bill of lading and this chapter.

A carrier may buy at a public sale under this section.

A purchaser in good faith of goods sold to enforce a carrier’s lien takes the goods free of the rights of persons against whom the lien was valid, despite the carrier’s noncompliance with this section.

A carrier may satisfy the carrier’s lien from the proceeds of a sale under this section, but shall hold the balance, if any, for delivery on demand to a person to whom the carrier would have been bound to deliver the goods.

The rights provided by this section are in addition to all other rights allowed by law to a creditor against a debtor.

A carrier’s lien may be enforced in accordance with either (a) of this section or the procedure set out in AS

45.07.210(b)

.

A carrier is liable for damages caused by failure to comply with the requirements for sale under this section and, in case of wilful violation, is liable for conversion.

History.

(§ 7.308 ch 114 SLA 1962; am §§ 55 — 60 ch 44 SLA 2009)

Cross references. —

For applicability and savings provisions related to the 2009 amendment of this section, see §§ 115 and 116, ch. 44, SLA 2009, quoted in the editor’s note that follows the chapter analysis for this chapter.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective January 1, 2010, rewrote (a), which read, “A carrier’s lien may be enforced by public or private sale of the goods, in block or in parcels, at any time or place, and on any terms that are commercially reasonable, after notifying all persons known to claim an interest in the goods. This notification must include a statement of the amount due, the nature of the proposed sale, and the time and place of a public sale.
The fact that a better price could have been obtained by a sale at a different time or in a different method from that selected by the carrier is not of itself sufficient to establish that the sale was not made in a commercially reasonable manner. If the carrier either sells the goods in the usual manner in a recognized market for them or if the carrier sells at the price current in the market at the time of the sale or if the carrier has otherwise sold in conformity with commercially reasonable practices among dealers in the type of goods sold, the carrier has sold in a commercially reasonable manner.
A sale of more goods than apparently necessary to be offered to ensure satisfaction of the obligation is not commercially reasonable except in cases covered by the preceding sentence.”; in (b), substituted “in complying with” for “under” following “reasonable expenses incurred”, substituted “the goods may” for “the goods must”, added “of lading” following “subject to the terms of the bill”; in (d), substituted “the carrier’s noncompliance with this section” for “noncompliance by the carrier with the requirements of this section”; rewrote (e), which read, “The carrier may satisfy the lien from the proceeds of a sale under this section, but must hold the balance for delivery on demand to a person to whom the carrier would have been bound to deliver the goods.”; made stylistic changes throughout the section.

Sec. 45.07.309.
Duty of care; contractual limitation of carrier’s liability.

A carrier who issues a bill of lading, whether negotiable or nonnegotiable, shall exercise the degree of care in relation to the goods that a reasonably careful person would exercise under similar circumstances. This subsection does not affect a statute, regulation, or rule of law that imposes liability on a common carrier for damages not caused by its negligence.

Damages may be limited by a term in the bill of lading or in a transportation agreement that the carrier’s liability may not exceed a value stated in the bill or transportation agreement if the carrier’s rates are dependent on value and the consignor is afforded an opportunity to declare a higher value and the consigner is advised of this opportunity. However, the limitation is not effective with respect to the carrier’s liability for conversion to its own use.

Reasonable provisions as to the time and manner of presenting claims and commencing actions based on the shipment may be included in a bill of lading or a transportation agreement.

History.

(§ 7.309 ch 114 SLA 1962; am § 56 ch 41 SLA 2009; am § 61 ch 44 SLA 2009)

Cross references. —

For applicability and savings provisions related to the amendment of this section, by § 61, ch. 44, SLA 2009, see §§ 115 and 116, ch. 44, SLA 2009, quoted in the editor’s note that follows the chapter analysis for this chapter.

Effect of amendments. —

The first 2009 amendment, effective June 21, 2009, in (a), substituted “shall” for “must” preceding “exercise the degree of care”, and substituted “person” for “man” following “reasonably careful”.

The second 2009 amendment, effective January 1, 2010, in (a), substituted “does not affect a statute, regulation, or rule of law” for “does not repeal or change any law or rule of law”; rewrote (b), which read, “Damages may be limited by a provision that the carrier’s liability shall not exceed a value stated in the document if the carrier’s rates are dependent upon value and the consignor by the carrier’s tariff is afforded an opportunity to declare a higher value or a value as lawfully provided in the tariff, or if no tariff is filed the consigner is otherwise advised of this opportunity; but no such limitation is effective with respect to the carrier’s liability for conversion to its own use.”; in (c), substituted “commencing” for “instituting” and “a transportation agreement” for “tariff”; made stylistic changes throughout the section.